Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3 Perfection and Priority
§ 28-9-334. Priority of security interests in fixtures and crops.

A security interest under this chapter may be created in goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures. A security interest does not exist under this chapter in ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

This chapter does not prevent creation of an encumbrance upon fixtures under real property law.

In cases not governed by subsections (d) through (h) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the related real property other than the debtor.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h) of this section, a perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property and:

The security interest is a purchase-money security interest;

The interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures; and

The security interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or within twenty (20) days thereafter.

A perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

The debtor has an interest of record in the real property or is in possession of the real property and the security interest:

is perfected by a fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record; and

has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner;

Before the goods become fixtures, the security interest is perfected by any method permitted by this chapter and the fixtures are readily removable:

factory or office machines;

equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real property; or

replacements of domestic appliances that are consumer goods;

The conflicting interest is a lien on the real property obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the security interest was perfected by any method permitted by this chapter; or

The security interest is:

created in a manufactured home in a manufactured home transaction; and

perfected pursuant to a statute described in section 28-9-311(a)(2)[, Idaho Code].

A security interest in fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

The encumbrancer or owner has, in an authenticated record, consented to the security interest or disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

The debtor has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner.
(g) The priority of the security interest under subsection (f)(2) of this section continues for a reasonable time if the debtor’s right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner terminates.

A perfected security interest in crops growing on real property has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property.

(h) A mortgage is a construction mortgage to the extent that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land, including the acquisition cost of the land, if a recorded record of the mortgage so indicates. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a construction mortgage if a record of the mortgage is recorded before the goods become fixtures and the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. A mortgage has this priority to the same extent as a construction mortgage to the extent that it is given to refinance a construction mortgage.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-334, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-335. Accessions.

A security interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral that becomes an accession.

If a security interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an accession, the security interest remains perfected in the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (g) of this section, the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security interest in an accession.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate of title statute under section 28-9-311(b)[, Idaho Code].

After default, subject to part 6[, chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code], a secured party may remove an accession from other goods if the security interest in the accession has priority over the claims of every person having an interest in the whole.

A secured party that removes an accession from other goods under subsection (e) of this section shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the holder or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by the absence of the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

A security interest in an accession has priority over a security interest in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate-of-title statute under subsection (b) of section 28-9-311, Idaho Code, if the security interest in the accession is a purchase money security interest that is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the accession or within twenty (20) days thereafter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-335, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-336. Commingled goods.

In this section, “commingled goods” means goods that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that their identity is lost in a product or mass.

A security interest does not exist in commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a product or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

If collateral becomes commingled goods, a security interest attaches to the product or mass.

If a security interest in collateral is perfected before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this section is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this section.

If more than one (1) security interest attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this section, the following rules determine priority:

A security interest that is perfected under subsection (d) of this section has priority over a security interest that is unperfected at the time the collateral becomes commingled goods.

If more than one (1) security interest is perfected under subsection (d) of this section, the security interests rank equally in proportion to the value of the collateral at the time it became commingled goods.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-336, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-337. Priority of security interests in goods covered by certificate of title.

If, while a security interest in goods is perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction, this state issues a certificate of title that does not show that the goods are subject to the security interest or contain a statement that they may be subject to security interests not shown on the certificate:

A buyer of the goods, other than a person in the business of selling goods of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the goods after issuance of the certificate and without knowledge of the security interest; and

The security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security interest in the goods that attaches, and is perfected under section 28-9-311(b)[, Idaho Code], after issuance of the certificate and without the conflicting secured party’s knowledge of the security interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-337, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-338. Priority of security interest or agricultural lien perfected by filed financing statement providing certain incorrect information.

If a security interest or agricultural lien is perfected by a filed financing statement providing information described in section 28-9-516(b)(5)[, Idaho Code,] which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed:

The security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to a conflicting perfected security interest in the collateral to the extent that the holder of the conflicting security interest gives value in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information; and

A purchaser, other than a secured party, of the collateral takes free of the security interest or agricultural lien to the extent that, in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information, the purchaser gives value and, in the case of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a security certificate, receives delivery of the collateral.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-338, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 31, p. 77.

§ 28-9-339. Priority subject to subordination.

This article does not preclude subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-339, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-340. Effectiveness of right of recoupment or set-off against deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a bank with which a deposit account is maintained may exercise any right of recoupment or set-off against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, the application of this chapter to a security interest in a deposit account does not affect a right of recoupment or set-off of the secured party as to a deposit account maintained with the secured party.

The exercise by a bank of a set-off against a deposit account is ineffective against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account which is perfected by control under section 28-9-104(a)(3)[, Idaho Code], if the set-off is based on a claim against the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-340, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-341. Bank’s rights and duties with respect to deposit account.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-340(c)[, Idaho Code], and unless the bank otherwise agrees in an authenticated record, a bank’s rights and duties with respect to a deposit account maintained with the bank are not terminated, suspended or modified by:

The creation, attachment or perfection of a security interest in the deposit account;

The bank’s knowledge of the security interest; or

The bank’s receipt of instructions from the secured party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-341, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-342. Bank’s right to refuse to enter into or disclose existence of control agreement.

This chapter does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind described in section 28-9-104(a)(2)[, Idaho Code], even if its customer so requests or directs. A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to do so by its customer.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-342, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.